Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1902.   Requirement to exhaust administrative remedies -- Protests and appeals.

(1)  A person may not challenge a procurement, a procurement process, the award of a contract relating to a procurement, a debarment, or a suspension, in a court, before an administrative officer or body, or in any other forum other than the forum permitted in this chapter.

(2)  A person who desires to challenge a procurement, a procurement process, the award of a contract relating to a procurement, a debarment, or a suspension, shall bring the challenge, in accordance with the requirements of this chapter, by timely filing:

(a)  a protest in accordance with Section 63G-6a-1602;

(b)  any appeal of the protest decision involving a procurement unit, other than a legislative procurement unit, a judicial procurement unit, a local government procurement unit, or a public transit district, in accordance with Section 63G-6a-1702; and

(c)  any appeal from a procurement appeals panel, or from a protest decision of a legislative procurement unit, a judicial procurement unit, a local government procurement unit, or a public transit district, in accordance with Section 63G-6a-1802.

(3) A person who files a protest or appeal under this chapter is limited to protesting or appealing on the grounds specified in the filing document described in Subsection 63G-6a-1602.

(4)  In hearing a protest or an appeal under this chapter relating to an expenditure of federal assistance, federal contract funds, or a federal grant, the person who hears the appeal shall ensure compliance with federal law and regulations relating to the expenditure.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

